Illinois, session 104th, HB5799.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-120 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-120 new)7    Sec. 22-120. Interscholastic competition equity impact 8review. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Length of the full sports season" means the period 11between the first day of practice and the last day of the State 12championship.13    "Length of the regular sports season" means the period 14between the first day that an interscholastic competition may 15be held and the last day before the State series competition 16begins.17    (b) A statewide athletic association governing 18interscholastic competition for public schools must conduct an 19equity impact review if the statewide athletic association has 20established or changed within one year before the effective 21date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly or on 22or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 23General Assembly a policy that:  HB5799- 2 -LRB104 22380 LNS 38823 b1        (1) reduces the opportunities in a girls' sport 2    without making an equivalent reduction in a comparable 3    boys' sport;4        (2) causes the length of the regular sports season or 5    the length of the full sports season to differ by more than 6    one week for comparable sports offered to both sexes; or7        (3) causes the nature and extent of interscholastic 8    sports offered by the statewide athletic association to 9    not accommodate the interests and abilities of both sexes 10    to a comparable degree.11    (c) Factors to be considered in assessing program 12comparability shall include, but are not limited to:13        (1) the selection of sports offered;14        (2) the levels of competition within sports;15        (3) the length of the regular sports season;16        (4) the length of the full sports season;17        (5) the scheduling of athletic opportunities 18    throughout the calendar year;19        (6) the scheduling of practices and games during prime 20    time;21        (7) the use of facilities for practice and 22    competition;23        (8) the ratio of coaches to athletes;24        (9) the quality of coaching and officiating, including 25    credentials, experience, and compensation;26        (10) the assignment and compensation of coaches and   HB5799- 3 -LRB104 22380 LNS 38823 b1    officials;2        (11) the supplies and equipment;3        (12) the allowances for travel and per diem;4        (13) the medical and training services;5        (14) the publicity for teams and individual 6    participants; and7        (15) the overall distribution of athletic budget 8    funds.9    (d) A statewide athletic association governing 10interscholastic competition for public schools must conduct 11the equity impact review described in subsection (b):12        (1) by July 1, 2027, if the policy was established or 13    changed during the year immediately preceding the 14    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15    Assembly; or16        (2) within 90 days of the policy being established or 17    changed, if the policy is established or changed on or 18    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 19    104th General Assembly.20    (e) The equity impact review shall include, but shall not 21be limited to:22        (1) a comparison with the comparable boys sport;23        (2) a justification for the proposed reduction or 24    discrepancy in program comparability;25        (3) any health, safety, scheduling, facility, 26    officiating, or administrative data supporting the   HB5799- 4 -LRB104 22380 LNS 38823 b1    reduction or discrepancy in program comparability;2        (4) the expected impact of the reduction or 3    discrepancy in program comparability on student 4    participation, lower-level teams, schools, coaches, and 5    families; and6        (5) a review of whether the change disproportionately 7    reduces or limits opportunities for female 8    student-athletes, particularly in terms of competition and 9    recruitment.10    (f) The statewide athletic association shall make the 11equity impact review available to the public and allow for a 12public comment period of not less than 30 days before any 13changes are finalized.14    (g) The statewide athletic association shall submit each 15equity impact review to the State Board. The State Board may 16issue nonbinding findings regarding whether the reduction or 17discrepancy in program comparability complies with gender 18equity and student opportunity principles based on 23 Ill. 19Adm. Code 200.80 and 34 CFR 106.41. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.